Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.798

Higher education employees—Option to transfer to plan 3—Limitation on supplemental benefits under RCW 28B.10.400.

(1) All employees who are not qualified under RCW 41.32.836 and who are first employed by an institution of higher education in a position eligible for participation in old age annuities or retirement income plans under RCW 28B.10.400 on or after July 1, 2011, have a period of thirty days to make an irrevocable choice to:

(a) Become a member of the public employees' retirement system plan 3 under this chapter; or

(b) Participate in the annuities or retirement income plan provided by the institution.

(2) At the end of thirty days, if the member has not made a choice to become a member of the public employees' retirement system, he or she becomes a participant in the institution's plan under RCW 28B.10.400, but does not become eligible for any supplemental benefit under RCW 28B.10.400(1)(c).

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 18.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 47: See notes following RCW 28B.10.400.